Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.26.180.
Exemption.

An individual who is employed by a financial institution regulated by the federal government or a financial institution regulated under AS 06 by the department is not required to be licensed under this chapter in order to engage, in the course of the individual’s employment by the financial institution, in the business of providing services as a guardian or a conservator or be appointed as a private professional guardian or a private professional conservator by a court. In this section, “financial institution” does not include a person who is exempt under AS

06.26.020

or who has received an exemption under AS

06.26.200

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 14 SLA 2005; am § 11 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.26.190.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“conservator” has the meaning given in AS

13.06.050

;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“guardian” has the meaning given in AS

13.06.050

;

“licensee” means a person licensed under this chapter;

“private professional conservator” means an individual who acts as a conservator under 13.26.401 — 13.26.580 and receives compensation for acting in that capacity;

“private professional conservator license” means a license issued under AS

08.26.030

;

“private professional guardian” means an individual who acts as a guardian under 13.26.101 — 13.26.316 and receives compensation for acting in that capacity;

“private professional guardian license” means a license issued under AS

08.26.020

;

“protected person” has the meaning given in AS

13.26.005

;

“ward” has the meaning given in AS

13.26.005

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 12 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in paragraph (2) of this section to reconcile chs. 47 and 84, SLA 2004. In 2005, in paragraph (9), “AS

08.26.020

” was substituted for “AS

08.26.040

” to correct a manifest error in ch. 84, SLA 2004.

In 2016, "AS

13.26.401

--

13.26.580

" was substituted for "AS

13.26.165

--

13.26.320

" in paragraph (5) and "AS

13.26.101

--

13.26.316

" was substituted for "AS 13.26.030 --

13.26.150

" in paragraph (7) to reflect the renumbering of those sections.